test/src/morphology/N-laiwh14_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - laiõh: # Noun (14) laiõh 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     laiõh+N+Sg+Nom: laiõh
     laiõh+N+Sg+Gen: laidõ
     laiõh+N+Sg+Par: laiõht
     laiõh+N+Sg+Ill: laidõhe
     laiõh+N+Pl+Gen: [laididõ, laiõhtõ]
     laiõh+N+Pl+Par: laidit
     laiõh+N+Pl+Ill: [laidihe, laiõhtõhe]
     laiõh+N+Pl+All: [laidilõ, laiõhtõlõ]
